lexicons/verbs_deriv.lexc
!!!!!! Derivational prefixes

LEXICON Verb-deriv-prefixes
:%[%+approx%]м%{Æ%}ч%{ы%}%> Verbs ;
:%[%+ints%]т%{Æ%}ӈ%{ы%}%> V-DERIV-PREF-INTS ;
: V-DERIV-PREF-INTS ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-PREF-INTS
:%[%+ints2%]ԓги%> V-DERIV-VBASE ;
: V-DERIV-VBASE ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-VBASE
! Verb bases
@P.VPR.vb_com@:@P.VPR.vb_com@г%{Æ%}%> V-DERIV-PREF-DESID ;
@P.VPR.vb_restr@:@P.VPR.vb_restr@%{Æ%}м%{ы%}%> V-DERIV-PREF-DESID ;
@P.VPR.vb_intens@:@P.VPR.vb_intens@т%{Æ%}ԓв%{Æ%}%> V-DERIV-PREF-DESID ;
@P.VPR.vb_approx@:@P.VPR.vb_approx@м%{Æ%}ч%{ы%}%> V-DERIV-PREF-DESID ;
@P.VPR.vb_neg@:@P.VPR.vb_neg@ԓюн%{ы%}%> V-DERIV-PREF-DESID ;
@P.VPR.vb_neg2@:@P.VPR.vb_neg2@%{Æ%}%> V-DERIV-PREF-DESID ;
@R.VPR.imposs@:@R.VPR.imposs@%{Æ%}ʼӄ%{Æ%}%> V-DERIV-PREF-DESID ;
: V-DERIV-PREF-DESID ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-PREF-DESID
:%[%+desid%]р%{Æ%}%> V-DERIV-PREF-AP ;
: V-DERIV-PREF-AP ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-PREF-AP
:%[%+ap%]ин%{Æ%}%> V-DERIV-PREF-CAUS ;
: V-DERIV-PREF-CAUS ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-PREF-CAUS
:%[%+caus%]%{R%}%{ы%}%> Verbs ;
: Verbs ;


! %<root here%>


!!!!!! Derivational suffixes

LEXICON V-DERIV
! prefix tags
%<approx%>:%[%+approx%] V-IV-AFFIX ;
! thematic smth
%<th%>:%>въи # ;
: V-DERIV-INTS ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-INTS
%<ints%>:%[%+ints%] V-DERIV-INTS2 ;
: V-DERIV-INTS2 ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-INTS2
%<ints2%>:%[%+ints2%] V-DERIV-AP-PREF ;
: V-DERIV-AP-PREF ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-AP-PREF
%<ap%>:%[%+ap%] V-DERIV-CAUS ;
: V-DERIV-CAUS ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-CAUS
%<caus%>:%[%+caus%] V-DERIV-SUFF ;
: V-DERIV-SUFF ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-SUFF
! incompatible w/others (probably)
%<punct%>:%>%{ы%}чӄыч%{Æ%}т V-DERIV-TH ;
%<dim%>:%>%{ы%}ӄ%{Æ%}%{Æ%}т V-DERIV-TH ;
%<aug%>:%>%{ы%}чгат V-DERIV-TH ;
! attach right to the stem
%<res%>:%>%{ы%}тва V-DERIV-TH ;
%<rev%>:%>%{ы%}тв V-DERIV-TH ;
%<purp%>:%>%{ы%}чӄив V-DERIV-TH ;
%<consume%>:%>у V-DERIV-TH ;
%<utilit%>:%>%{ы%}тку V-DERIV-TH ;
: V-DERIV-TH ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-TH
%<th%>:%>%{Æ%}т V-DERIV-AP ;
%<th%>:%>%{Æ%}в V-DERIV-AP ;
%<th%>:%>%{Æ%}%{Æ%} V-DERIV-AP ;
%<th%>:%>ъ%{Æ%} V-DERIV-AP ;
: V-DERIV-AP ;


LEXICON V-DERIV-AP             ! Antipassive
%<ap2%>:%>%{ы%}тку V-DERIV-DESID ;
: V-DERIV-DESID ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-DESID
%<desid%>:%[%+desid%]%>ӈ V-DERIV-ITER ;
: V-DERIV-ITER ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-ITER
%<iter%>:%>%{ы%}тку V-DERIV-COOP ;
: V-DERIV-COOP ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-COOP
%<coop_s%>:%>%{ы%}ръу V-DERIV-DUR ;
%<coop_o%>:%>%{ы%}йв V-DERIV-DUR ;
: V-DERIV-DUR ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-DUR
%<dur%>:%>%{ы%}ԓъ%{Æ%}т V-DERIV-INCH ;
: V-DERIV-INCH ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-INCH
%<inch%>:%>%{ы%}мго V-DERIV-FIN ;
%<inch2%>:%>%{ы%}ӈӈо V-DERIV-FIN ;
%<compl%>:%>%{ы%}пԓытку V-DERIV-FIN ;
: V-DERIV-FIN ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-FIN
! these form nouns from verbs
@D.VPR@%<ptcp%>%<act%>:@D.VPR@ԓь N-DERIV-I ;
@D.VPR@%<ptcp%>%<pass%>:@D.VPR@йо N-DERIV-I ;
@D.VPR@%<ger%>:@D.VPR@ԓӄыԓ N-DERIV-I ;
@D.VPR@%<ger%>:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}гырг%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} N-DERIV-III ;

@R.VPR.vb_com@%<com%>%<vb%>:@R.VPR.vb_com@%>%{T%}%{Æ%} # ;
@R.VPR.vb_com@%<com%>%<vb%>:@R.VPR.vb_com@%>%{ы%}ма # ;
@R.VPR.vb_restr@%<restr%>%<vb%>:@R.VPR.vb_restr@%>%{T%}%{Æ%} # ;
@R.VPR.vb_intens@%<ints%>%<vb%>:@R.VPR.vb_intens@%>%{T%}%{Æ%} # ;
@R.VPR.vb_approx@%<approx%>%<vb%>:@R.VPR.vb_approx@%>%{T%}%{Æ%} # ;
@R.VPR.vb_neg@%<neg%>%<perf%>%<vb%>:@R.VPR.vb_neg@%>%{T%}%{Æ%} # ;
@R.VPR.vb_neg2@%<neg%>%<hab%>%<vb%>:@R.VPR.vb_neg2@%>%{ы%}к%{Æ%} # ;
@D.VPR@%<vb%>:@D.VPR@%>%{T%}%{Æ%} # ;
@D.VPR@%<vb%>:@D.VPR@%>%{G%}ты%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} # ;
@D.VPR@%<vb%>:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}ӈ%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} # ;
@R.VPR.imposs@%<imposs%>%<vb%>:@R.VPR.imposs@%>%{ы%}ӈ%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} # ;

@U.V.iv@:@U.V.iv@ V-IV-AFFIX ;
@U.V.tv@:@U.V.tv@ V-TV-AFFIX ;
!
